Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.5221

Seattle NHL hockey special license plates.

"Seattle NHL hockey special license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display the logo of the national hockey league team based in Seattle.

[ 2020 c 129 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 129: See note following RCW 46.17.220.